Massachusetts, session 194th, H1955.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “substances”, in line 123, the
following words:- ; provided, however, that said testing equipment shall not include fentanyl test
strips or any testing equipment or device solely used, intended for use or designed to be used to
determine whether a substance contains fentanyl or its analogues.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 94C is hereby further amended by inserting after section 19F
the following section:-
Section 19G. Any person who, in good faith, provides, administers or utilizes a fentanyl
test strip or any testing equipment or device solely used, intended for use or designed to be used
to determine whether a substance contains fentanyl or its analogues shall not, as a result of the
person’s acts or omissions, be subject to any criminal or civil liability or any professional
of 2

disciplinary action; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to acts of gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
of 2